nl: MAP-sensor uitgangssignaaltype: Analoge spanning; Digitaal (CAN); Digitaal (LIN); Digitaal (SENT); Frequentie-uitvoer; PWM; Anders
bg-BG: Тип изходен сигнал на MAP сензора: Аналогово напрежение; Цифров (CAN); Цифров (LIN); Цифров (SENT); Честотен изход; PWM; Друго
ru: Тип выходного сигнала MAP-датчика: Аналоговое напряжение; Цифровой (CAN); Цифровой (LIN); Цифровой (SENT); Частотный выход; ШИМ; Другое
es: Tipo de señal de salida del sensor MAP: Voltaje analógico; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Salida de frecuencia; PWM; Otro
fi: MAP-anturin lähtösignaalin tyyppi: Analoginen jännite; Digitaalinen (CAN); Digitaalinen (LIN); Digitaalinen (SENT); Taajuusulostulo; PWM; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul semnalului de ieșire al senzorului MAP: Tensiune analogică; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Ieșire de frecvență; PWM; Altele
sv: Utsignaltyp för MAP-sensor: Analog spänning; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Frekvensutgång; PWM; Annat
el: Τύπος σήματος εξόδου αισθητήρα MAP: Αναλογική τάση; Ψηφιακό (CAN); Ψηφιακό (LIN); Ψηφιακό (SENT); Έξοδος συχνότητας; PWM; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de sinal de saída do sensor MAP: Tensão analógica; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Saída de frequência; PWM; Outro
vi: Loại tín hiệu đầu ra của cảm biến MAP: Điện áp analog; Kỹ thuật số (CAN); Kỹ thuật số (LIN); Kỹ thuật số (SENT); Đầu ra tần số; PWM; Khác
zh-TW: MAP 感測器輸出訊號類型: 類比電壓; 數位 (CAN); 數位 (LIN); 數位 (SENT); 頻率輸出; PWM; 其他
hu: MAP-érzékelő kimeneti jelének típusa: Analóg feszültség; Digitális (CAN); Digitális (LIN); Digitális (SENT); Frekvenciakimenet; PWM; Egyéb
fr: Type de signal de sortie du capteur MAP: Tension analogique; Numérique (CAN); Numérique (LIN); Numérique (SENT); Sortie de fréquence; PWM; Autre
cs: Typ výstupního signálu MAP senzoru: Analogové napětí; Digitální (CAN); Digitální (LIN); Digitální (SENT); Frekvenční výstup; PWM; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta izhodnega signala senzorja MAP: Analogna napetost; Digitalni (CAN); Digitalni (LIN); Digitalni (SENT); Frekvenčni izhod; PWM; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog signala MAP senzora: Analogni napon; Digitalni (CAN); Digitalni (LIN); Digitalni (SENT); Frekvencijski izlaz; PWM; Ostalo
nb: Type utgangssignal fra MAP-sensor: Analog spenning; Digitalt (CAN); Digitalt (LIN); Digitalt (SENT); Frekvensutgang; PWM; Annet
it: Tipo di segnale di uscita del sensore MAP: Tensione analogica; Digitale (CAN); Digitale (LIN); Digitale (SENT); Uscita in frequenza; PWM; Altro
en: MAP sensor output signal type: Analog voltage; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Frequency output; PWM; Other
ko: MAP 센서 출력 신호 유형: 아날로그 전압; 디지털(CAN); 디지털(LIN); 디지털(SENT); 주파수 출력; PWM; 기타
th: ประเภทสัญญาณเอาต์พุตของเซ็นเซอร์ MAP: แรงดันไฟฟ้าแอนะล็อก; ดิจิทัล (CAN); ดิจิทัล (LIN); ดิจิทัล (SENT); เอาต์พุตความถี่; PWM; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Sensor MAP sinal de saída tipo: Tensão analógica; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Saída de frequência; PWM; Outro
de: Typ des Ausgangssignals des MAP-Sensors: Analoge Spannung; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Frequenzausgabe; PWM; Sonstige
tr: MAP sensörü çıkış sinyali tipi: Analog voltaj; Dijital (CAN); Dijital (LIN); Dijital (SENT); Frekans çıkışı; PWM; Diğer
pl: Typ sygnału wyjściowego czujnika MAP: Napięcie analogowe; Cyfrowy (CAN); Cyfrowy (LIN); Cyfrowy (SENT); Wyjście częstotliwościowe; PWM; Inne
da: MAP-sensorens udgangssignaltype: Analog spænding; Digital (CAN); Digital (LIN); Digital (SENT); Frekvensoutput; PWM; Andet
sk-SK: Typ výstupného signálu snímača MAP: Analógové napätie; Digitálny (CAN); Digitálny (LIN); Digitálny (SENT); Frekvenčný výstup; PWM; Iný
ja: MAPセンサー出力信号タイプ: アナログ電圧; デジタル (CAN); デジタル (LIN); デジタル (SENT); 周波数出力; PWM; その他
lt-LT: MAP jutiklio išvesties signalo tipas: Analoginė įtampa; Skaitmeninis (CAN); Skaitmeninis (LIN); Skaitmeninis (SENT); Dažnio išvestis; PWM; Kita
zh-CN: MAP 传感器输出信号类型: 模拟电压; 数字 (CAN); 数字 (LIN); 数字 (SENT); 频率输出; PWM; 其他